Massachusetts, session 194th, H3091.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 62 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 6N, as appearing in the 2012 Official Edition, the following section:-
Section 6O. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of revenue.
“Cultural district”, a geographical area of a city or town within the commonwealth
designated as a cultural district pursuant to the provisions of section 58A of chapter 10.
“Department”, the department of housing and community development, or its successor
agency.
of 9

“Eligibility statement”, a statement authorized and issued by the department certifying
that a given project is a qualified project. The department shall, in consultation with the
commissioner, promulgate regulations establishing criteria upon which the eligibility statements
will be issued. The eligibility statement shall specify the maximum annual amount of the
Massachusetts artist work shop tax credit authorized. The department shall only authorize the tax
credits to qualified projects which are placed in service on or after January 1, 2016.
“Qualified project”, a project for the construction of a new building located in a cultural
district, or renovation of an existing building located in a cultural district, providing artists with
the workspace necessary to produce art, which meets the requirements of this section.
“Taxpayer”, a person, firm, partnership or other entity subject to the income tax imposed
by the provisions of this chapter hired as a contractor, subcontractor or otherwise to perform
construction on a qualified project.
(b)(1) There shall be a Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit. The department may
authorize annually under this section together with section 38GGH of chapter 63 the total sum
of: (i) $20,000,000; (ii) unused Massachusetts artist workspace tax credits, if any, for the
preceding calendar years; and (iii) Massachusetts artist workspace tax credits returned to the
department by a qualified project.
(2) Unless otherwise provided in this section or the context clearly requires otherwise, the
department shall authorize, administer, determine eligibility for the Massachusetts artist
workspace tax credit.
of 9

(3) The department shall allocate the total available Massachusetts artist workspace tax
credit among as many qualified projects as fiscally feasible, with the goal of increasing the
commonwealth's stock of artist workspace.
(c)(1) A taxpayer may be allowed a state tax credit with respect to a qualified project,
provided that the department issues an eligibility statement for that qualified project. This state
tax credit shall be termed the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit.
(2) The total Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit available to a qualified project
shall be authorized and allocated by the department, or its successor agency, based on the
qualified project's need for the credit for economic feasibility.
(3) The Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit shall be taken against the taxes
imposed under this chapter, claimed equally for 5 years, subtracted from the amount of state tax
otherwise due for each taxable period and shall not be refundable. Any amount of the artist
workspace tax credit that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to any of
the 5 subsequent taxable years.
(4) All or any portion of tax credits issued in accordance with the provisions of this
section may be allocated to parties who are eligible under the provisions of paragraph (1) of
subsection (c). A taxpayer shall certify to the commissioner the amount of credit allocated to
such taxpayer. The taxpayer shall provide to the commissioner appropriate information so that
the artist workspace tax credit can be properly allocated.
(5) In the event that recapture of Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit is required,
any statement submitted to the commissioner as provided in subsection (c) shall include the
of 9

proportion of the state credit required to be recaptured, the identity of each taxpayer subject to
the recapture and the amount of credit previously allocated to such taxpayer.
(6) The director of the department, in consultation with the commissioner, shall
promulgate regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.
(d) The taxpayer shall submit, at the time of filing the taxpayer’s state tax return, a copy
of the eligibility statement issued by the department with respect to such qualified project. In the
case of failure to attach the eligibility statement, a credit under this section shall not be allowed
with respect to such qualified project for that year until the copy is provided to the department of
revenue.
(e) The commissioner or the department, through the promulgation of regulations, may
require the filing of additional documentation necessary to determine the eligibility or accuracy
of a tax credit claimed under the provisions of this section.
(f) The department, in consultation with the commissioner, shall monitor and oversee
compliance with the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit program and may promulgate
regulations requiring the filing of additional documentation deemed necessary to determine
continuing eligibility for the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit. The department or the
commissioner shall report specific occurrences of noncompliance to appropriate state, federal
and local authorities.
(g) Except for unused credits carried forward pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection (c)
and section 38GGH of chapter 63, a qualified project shall not be eligible for any Massachusetts
artist workspace tax credits for more than 7 taxable years.
of 9

(h) The department may provide that upon application for state tax credits issued by the
department, such taxpayer may elect to receive such state tax credit in the form of a loan
generated by transferring the credit to the department or its designee on terms specified by the
department in accordance with its qualified allocation plan. Neither a direct tax refund nor a loan
received as the result of the transfer of the credit shall be considered taxable income under this
chapter.
(i) The department may pursue methods of enhancing the efficiency of the Massachusetts
artist workspace tax credit program including but not limited to: pursuing opinions from the
United States department of treasury's internal revenue service in the form of general counsel
memoranda, private letter rulings and other notices, rulings or guidelines; by reviewing other
state tax programs which utilize an option for taxpayers to receive such tax credit in the form of a
loan generated by transferring the credit to a designated state entity; and any other such methods.
SECTION 2. Chapter 63 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 38FF, as so appearing, the following section:-
Section 38GG. (a) For the purposes of this section, unless the context clearly requires
otherwise, the following words shall have the following meanings:-
“Commissioner”, the commissioner of the department of revenue
“Cultural district”, a geographical area of a city or town within the commonwealth
designated as a cultural district pursuant to the provisions of section 58A of chapter 10.
“Department”, the department of housing and community development, or its successor
agency.
of 9

“Eligibility statement”, a statement authorized and issued by the department certifying
that a given project is a qualified artist workspace project. The department, in consultation with
the commissioner, shall promulgate regulations establishing criteria upon which the eligibility
statements shall be issued. The eligibility statement shall specify the maximum annual amount of
the artist workspace tax credit authorized. The department shall only authorize the tax credits to
qualified artist workspace projects which are placed in service on or after January 1, 2016.
“Qualified artist workspace project” or “qualified project”, a project for the construction
100 of a new building in a cultural district, or renovation of an existing building located in a cultural
101 district, providing artists with the workspace necessary to produce art, which meets the
102 requirements of this section.
103 “Taxpayer”, a corporation subject to an excise imposed by the provisions of this chapter,
104 including, without limitations, section 2, sections 20 to 23, inclusive, section 29A, section 32 and
105 section 39, hired as a contractor, subcontractor or otherwise to perform construction on a
106 qualified project..
107 (b)(1) There shall be a Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit. The department may
108 authorize annually under this section together with section 6O of chapter 62 the total sum of: (i)
109 $20,000,000; (ii) unused artist workspace tax credits, if any, for the preceding calendar years;
110 and (iii) any artist workspace tax credits returned to the department by a qualified artist
111 workspace project.
112 (2) Unless otherwise provided in this section or the context clearly requires otherwise, the
113 department shall authorize, administer, determine eligibility for the artist workspace tax credit.
of 9

114 (3) The department shall allocate the total available Massachusetts artist workspace tax
115 credit among as many qualified artist workspace projects as fiscally feasible, with the goal of
116 increasing the commonwealth's stock of artist workspace.
117 (c)(1) A taxpayer may be allowed a state tax credit with respect to a qualified artist
118 workspace project, provided that the department issues an eligibility statement for that qualified
119 project. This state tax credit shall be termed the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit.
120 (2) The total Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit available to a qualified project
121 shall be authorized and allocated by the department, or its successor agency, based on the
122 qualified project's need for the credit for economic feasibility.
123 (3) The Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit shall be taken against the taxes
124 imposed under this chapter, claimed equally for 5 years, subtracted from the amount of state tax
125 otherwise due for each taxable period and shall not be refundable. Any amount of the tax credit
126 that exceeds the tax due for a taxable year may be carried forward to any of the 5 subsequent
127 taxable years.
128 (4) All or any portion of tax credits issued in accordance with the provisions of this
129 section may be allocated to parties who are eligible under the provisions of paragraph (1) of
130 subsection (c). A taxpayer shall certify to the commissioner the amount of credit allocated to
131 such taxpayer. The taxpayer shall provide to the commissioner appropriate information so that
132 the artist workspace tax credit can be properly allocated.
133 (5) In the event that recapture of Massachusetts artist workspace tax credits is required,
134 any statement submitted to the commissioner as provided in subsection (c) shall include the
of 9

135 proportion of the state credit required to be recaptured, the identity of each taxpayer subject to
136 the recapture and the amount of credit previously allocated to such taxpayer.
137 (6) The director of the department, in consultation with the commissioner, shall
138 promulgate regulations necessary to administer the provisions of this subsection.
139 (d) The taxpayer shall submit, at the time of filing the taxpayer’s state tax return, a copy
140 of the eligibility statement issued by the department with respect to such qualified project. In the
141 case of failure to attach the eligibility statement, a credit under this section shall not be allowed
142 with respect to such qualified project for that year until the copy is provided to the department of
143 revenue.
144 (e) The commissioner or the department may require the filing of additional
145 documentation necessary to determine the eligibility or accuracy of a tax credit claimed under
146 the provisions of this section through the promulgation of regulations.
147 (f) The department, in consultation with the commissioner, shall monitor and oversee
148 compliance with the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit program and may promulgate
149 regulations requiring the filing of additional documentation deemed necessary to determine
150 continuing eligibility for the Massachusetts artist workspace tax credit. The department or the
151 commissioner shall report specific occurrences of noncompliance to appropriate state, federal
152 and local authorities.
153 (g) Except for unused credits carried forward pursuant to section 6O of chapter 62 and
154 paragraph (3) of subsection (c) of this section, a qualified project shall not be eligible for any
155 Massachusetts artist workspace tax credits for more than 7 taxable years.
of 9

156 (h) The department may provide that upon application for state tax credits issued by the
157 department, such taxpayer may elect to receive such state tax credit in the form of a loan
158 generated by transferring the credit to the department or its designee on terms specified by the
159 department in accordance with its qualified allocation plan. Neither a direct tax refund nor a loan
160 received as the result of the transfer of the credit shall be considered taxable income under this
161 chapter.
162 (i) The department may pursue methods of enhancing the efficiency of the Massachusetts
163 artist workspace tax credit program including but not limited to; pursuing opinions from the
164 United States department of treasury's internal revenue service in the form of general counsel
165 memoranda, private letter rulings and other notices, rulings or guidelines and reviewing other
166 state tax programs which utilize an option for taxpayers to receive such tax credit in the form of a
167 loan generated by transferring the credit to a designated state entity.
of 9